Florida, session 2026, HB5203.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
156
157 Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 11.26, Florida
158 Statutes, is amended to read:
159 11.26 Legislative employees; employment restrictions.—No
160 employee of the Legislature shall:
161 (3) No full-time legislative employee shall be otherwise
162 employed, except with the written permission of the presiding
163 officer of the house by which he or she is employed. Employees
164 of joint committees, joint offices, or the Florida
165 Accountability Office must have the permission of the presiding
166 officers of both houses.
167 Section 2. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (2) of
168 section 11.40, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
169 11.40 Legislative Auditing Committee.—
170 (2) Following notification by the Auditor General, the
171 Department of Financial Services, the Division of Bond Finance
172 of the State Board of Administration, the Governor or his or her
173 designee, or the Commissioner of Education or his or her
174 designee of the failure of a local governmental entity, district
175 school board, charter school, or charter technical career center
Page 7 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
176 to comply with the applicable provisions within s. 11.45(5)-(7),
177 s. 218.32(1), s. 218.38, or s. 218.503(3), the Legislative
178 Auditing Committee may schedule a hearing to determine if the
179 entity should be subject to further state action. If the
180 committee determines that the entity should be subject to
181 further state action, the committee shall:
182 (a) In the case of a local governmental entity or district
183 school board, advise direct the Department of Revenue and the
184 Department of Financial Services to withhold any funds not
185 pledged for bond debt service satisfaction which are payable to
186 such entity until the entity complies with the law. Upon receipt
187 of the committee shall specify the date that such advice, action
188 must begin, and the directive must be received by the Department
189 of Revenue and the Department of Financial Services shall have
190 the authority to withhold such funds until the entity complies
191 with the law. Beginning 30 days after receiving such advice,
192 each department must either withhold all such funds or report
193 the reasons for not doing so to the committee before the date of
194 the distribution mandated by law. The Department of Revenue and
195 the Department of Financial Services may implement this
196 paragraph.
197 (b) In the case of a special district created by:
198 1. A special act, notify the President of the Senate, the
199 Speaker of the House of Representatives, the standing committees
200 of the Senate and the House of Representatives charged with
Page 8 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
201 special district oversight as determined by the presiding
202 officers of each respective chamber, the legislators who
203 represent a portion of the geographical jurisdiction of the
204 special district, and the Department of Commerce that the
205 special district has failed to comply with the law. Upon receipt
206 of notification, the Department of Commerce shall proceed
207 pursuant to s. 189.062 or s. 189.067. If the special district
208 remains in noncompliance after the process set forth in s.
209 189.0651, or if a public hearing is not held, the Legislative
210 Auditing Committee may notify request the department, which
211 shall to proceed pursuant to s. 189.067(3).
212 2. A local ordinance, notify the chair or equivalent of
213 the local general-purpose government pursuant to s. 189.0652 and
214 the Department of Commerce that the special district has failed
215 to comply with the law. Upon receipt of notification, the
216 department shall proceed pursuant to s. 189.062 or s. 189.067.
217 If the special district remains in noncompliance after the
218 process set forth in s. 189.0652, or if a public hearing is not
219 held, the Legislative Auditing Committee may notify request the
220 department, which shall to proceed pursuant to s. 189.067(3).
221 3. Any manner other than a special act or local ordinance,
222 notify the Department of Commerce that the special district has
223 failed to comply with the law. Upon receipt of notification, the
224 department shall proceed pursuant to s. 189.062 or s.
225 189.067(3).
Page 9 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
226 Section 3. Effective November 18, 2027, subsection (3) of
227 section 11.40, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
228 11.40 Legislative Auditing Committee.—
229 (3)(a) As used in this subsection, "independent contract
230 auditor" means a state-licensed certified public accountant or
231 firm with which a state-licensed certified public accountant is
232 currently employed or associated who is actively engaged in the
233 accounting profession.
234 (b) Audits specified in this subsection cover the
235 quarterly compensation reports for the previous calendar year
236 for a random sample of 3 percent of all legislative branch
237 lobbying firms and a random sample of 3 percent of all executive
238 branch lobbying firms calculated using as the total number of
239 such lobbying firms those filing a compensation report for the
240 preceding calendar year. The committee shall provide for a
241 system of random selection of the lobbying firms to be audited.
242 (c) The committee shall create and maintain a list of not
243 less than 10 independent contract auditors approved to conduct
244 the required audits. Each lobbying firm selected for audit in
245 the random audit process may designate one of the independent
246 contract auditors from the committee's approved list. Upon
247 failure for any reason of a lobbying firm selected in the random
248 selection process to designate an independent contract auditor
249 from the committee's list within 30 calendar days after being
250 notified by the committee of its selection, the committee shall
Page 10 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
251 assign one of the available independent contract auditors from
252 the approved list to perform the required audit. No independent
253 contract auditor, whether designated by the lobbying firm or by
254 the committee, may perform the audit of a lobbying firm where
255 the auditor and lobbying firm have ever had a direct personal
256 relationship or any professional accounting, auditing, tax
257 advisory, or tax preparing relationship with each other. The
258 committee shall obtain a written, sworn certification subject to
259 s. 837.06, both from the randomly selected lobbying firm and
260 from the proposed independent contract auditor, that no such
261 relationship has ever existed.
262 (d) Each independent contract auditor shall be engaged by
263 and compensated solely by the state for the work performed in
264 accomplishing an audit under this subsection.
265 (e) Any violations of law, deficiencies, or material
266 misstatements discovered and noted in an audit report shall be
267 clearly identified in the audit report and be determined under
268 the rules of either house of the Legislature or under the joint
269 rules, as applicable.
270 (f) If any lobbying firm fails to give full, frank, and
271 prompt cooperation and access to books, records, and associated
272 backup documents as requested in writing by the auditor, that
273 failure shall be clearly noted by the independent contract
274 auditor in the report of audit.
275 (g) The committee shall establish procedures for the
Page 11 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
276 selection of independent contract auditors desiring to enter
277 into audit contracts pursuant to this subsection. Such
278 procedures shall include, but not be limited to, a rating system
279 that takes into account pertinent information, including the
280 independent contract auditor's fee proposals for participating
281 in the process. All contracts under this subsection between an
282 independent contract auditor and the Speaker of the House of
283 Representatives and the President of the Senate shall be
284 terminable by either party at any time upon written notice to
285 the other, and such contracts may contain such other terms and
286 conditions as the Speaker of the House of Representatives and
287 the President of the Senate deem appropriate under the
288 circumstances.
289 (h) The committee shall adopt guidelines that govern
290 random audits and field investigations conducted pursuant to
291 this subsection. The guidelines shall ensure that similarly
292 situated compensation reports are audited in a uniform manner.
293 The guidelines shall also be formulated to encourage compliance
294 and detect violations of the legislative and executive lobbying
295 compensation reporting requirements in ss. 11.045 and 112.3215
296 and to ensure that each audit is conducted with maximum
297 efficiency in a cost-effective manner. In adopting the
298 guidelines, the committee shall consider relevant guidelines and
299 standards of the American Institute of Certified Public
300 Accountants to the extent that such guidelines and standards are
Page 12 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
301 applicable and consistent with the purposes set forth in this
302 subsection.
303 (i) All audit reports of legislative lobbying firms shall,
304 upon completion by an independent contract auditor, be delivered
305 to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
306 Representatives for their respective review and handling. All
307 audit reports of executive branch lobbyists, upon completion by
308 an independent contract auditor, shall be delivered by the
309 auditor to the Commission on Ethics.
310 Section 4. Section 11.405, Florida Statutes, is created to
311 read:
312 11.405 The Florida Accountability Office.—
313 (1) There is created within the Legislature the Florida
314 Accountability Office to conduct audits, reviews, examinations,
315 investigations, evaluations, and assessments; to make
316 recommendations regarding the operations, performance, and
317 fiscal management of governmental entities of this state; and to
318 report findings to the Legislature and public agencies regarding
319 fiscal transparency, quality, effectiveness, efficiency, and
320 possible improvements to the programs, operations, and
321 performance of such governmental entities. The office shall be
322 administered as directed by the Legislature or by agreement of
323 the presiding officers of the Legislature.
324 (2) The office shall consist of the following units:
325 (a) The Division of the Auditor General, headed by the
Page 13 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
326 Auditor General, the auditor required by s. 2, Art. III of the
327 State Constitution, appointed by both houses of the Legislature
328 acting concurrently, unless otherwise provided by joint rule of
329 the Legislature. The Auditor General's term shall end on
330 November 30 after the first general election following
331 appointment. If a vacancy occurs while the Legislature is not in
332 session, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the
333 House of Representatives may appoint a temporary successor by
334 agreement. The Auditor General shall serve at the pleasure of
335 the Legislature. The Division of the Auditor General shall be
336 primarily responsible for financial audits required or
337 authorized by law. The Auditor General shall be primarily
338 responsible for audits authorized by s. 11.45(3)(a), (c), (g),
339 (i), (m), (r), and (v).
340 (b) The General Accountability Division, headed by the
341 General Accountability Officer appointed as provided by joint
342 rule of the Legislature or the agreement of the presiding
343 officers of the Legislature, unless otherwise organized as
344 provided by joint rule of the Legislature or the agreement of
345 the presiding officers of the Legislature. The General
346 Accountability Division shall be primarily responsible for
347 operational audits and compliance audits required or authorized
348 by law. The General Accountability Division shall be primarily
349 responsible for audits authorized by s. 11.45(3), except s.
350 11.45(3)(a), (c), (g), (i), (m), (r), and (v).
Page 14 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
351 (c) The Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
352 Accountability organized as provided by joint rule of the
353 Legislature or the agreement of the presiding officers of the
354 Legislature. The Office of Program Policy Analysis and
355 Government Accountability shall be primarily responsible for
356 performance audits required or authorized by law.
357 (d) The Public Integrity Division organized as provided by
358 joint rule of the Legislature or the agreement of the presiding
359 officers of the Legislature.
360 (3) The units shall cooperate and assist one another, as
361 resources allow, in order to make the most efficient use of the
362 resources of the Florida Accountability Office. A unit may not
363 conduct an audit or investigation that may interfere or disrupt
364 the audit or investigation conducted by another unit, but
365 cooperative audits and investigations may be conducted. A unit
366 shall assist, as requested by another unit, when its expertise
367 may be effectively utilized.
368 (4) Any unit may conduct any audit or investigation
369 authorized by s. 11.45, except a financial audit expressly
370 assigned to the Division of the Auditor General.
371 (5) When an audit or investigation is required or
372 authorized by general law, the unit conducting such audit or
373 investigation shall consult with the President of the Senate and
374 the Speaker of the House of Representatives for guidance
375 regarding the objectives and scope of such audit or
Page 15 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
376 investigation.
377 (6)(a) The headquarters of the Florida Accountability
378 Office shall be at the state capital, but to facilitate auditing
379 and to eliminate unnecessary traveling, the Legislature may
380 establish field offices located outside the state capital.
381 (b) The Legislature shall provide sufficient
382 administrative support to assist the Florida Accountability
383 Office in all spending decisions within the annual operating
384 budget approved by the President of the Senate and the Speaker
385 of the House of Representatives. The Florida Accountability
386 Office shall employ qualified persons necessary for the
387 efficient operation of the various units. The duties and
388 compensation of such employees and a uniform personnel, job
389 classification, and pay plan for such employees shall be
390 established with the approval of the President of the Senate and
391 the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or their joint
392 designees in the units of the Florida Accountability Office.
393 (7) An officer or a salaried employee of the Florida
394 Accountability Office may not serve as the representative of any
395 political party or on any executive committee or other governing
396 body thereof; serve as an executive, officer, or employee of any
397 political party committee, organization, or association; or be
398 engaged on behalf of any candidate for public office in the
399 solicitation of votes or other activities on behalf of such
400 candidacy. The Auditor General or any employee of the Florida
Page 16 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
401 Accountability Office may not become a candidate for election to
402 public office unless she or he first resigns from office or
403 employment.
404 Section 5. Section 11.406, Florida Statutes, is created to
405 read:
406 11.406 Public Integrity Division investigations.—
407 (1) As used in this section, the term:
408 (a) "Appropriations project" means a specific
409 appropriation or proviso defined as an appropriations project by
410 legislative rule in the year in which it was enacted.
411 (b) "Investigation" means an audit, a review, or any other
412 examination or inquiry into the factual basis of any complaint
413 investigated pursuant to subsection (2).
414 (2) The Public Integrity Division of the Florida
415 Accountability Office may receive and investigate a complaint
416 alleging fraud, waste, abuse, mismanagement, or misconduct in
417 connection with the expenditure of public funds.
418 (3) A complaint may be submitted to the Florida
419 Accountability Office by:
420 (a) The President of the Senate.
421 (b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.
422 (c) The chair of an appropriations committee of the Senate
423 or the House of Representatives.
424 (d) Any unit of the Florida Accountability Office.
425 (e) Any inspector general.
Page 17 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
426 (f) A whistle-blower reporting under s. 112.3187.
427 (4)(a) Upon receipt of a complaint, the Public Integrity
428 Division shall determine whether the complaint is supported by
429 sufficient information indicating a reasonable probability of
430 fraud, waste, abuse, mismanagement, or misconduct. If the Public
431 Integrity Division determines that the complaint is not
432 supported by sufficient information, the Public Integrity
433 Division shall notify the complainant in writing and the
434 complaint shall be closed.
435 (b) If the complaint is supported by sufficient
436 information and the Public Integrity Division determines that an
437 investigation into the matter has already been initiated by
438 another agency with investigative jurisdiction, the Public
439 Integrity Division may close the complaint, in which case the
440 Public Integrity Division must notify the complainant without
441 disclosing any confidential or exempt information relating to
442 such investigation.
443 (c) If the complaint is supported by sufficient
444 information and an investigation into the matter has not already
445 been initiated as described in paragraph (b), the Public
446 Integrity Division shall, within available resources and after
447 consultation with the other units of the Florida Accountability
448 Office, conduct an investigation and issue a report of the
449 investigative findings to the complainant and the President of
450 the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The
Page 18 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
451 Public Integrity Division may refer the matter to another unit
452 of the Florida Accountability Office, any appropriate law
453 enforcement agency, the Commission on Ethics, the Chief
454 Financial Officer, the Office of the Chief Inspector General, or
455 the applicable agency inspector general.
456 (5)(a) The Public Integrity Division may, when pertinent
457 to an investigation of a complaint, inspect and investigate the
458 books, records, papers, documents, data, operation, and physical
459 location of any public agency in this state, including any
460 confidential information; the public records of any entity that
461 has received direct appropriations or a direct payment of fees
462 or taxes collected by this state; and the records of any entity
463 that has contracted with this state whose records are subject to
464 public access pursuant to s. 287.058(1)(c). The Public Integrity
465 Division may agree to retain the confidentiality of confidential
466 information pursuant to s. 11.0431(2)(a).
467 (b) Upon request of the Public Integrity Division, the
468 Legislative Auditing Committee or any other committee of the
469 Legislature may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum, as
470 provided in s. 11.143, to compel testimony or the production of
471 evidence when deemed necessary to an investigation authorized by
472 this section. Consistent with s. 11.143, such subpoenas and
473 subpoenas duces tecum may be issued as provided by applicable
474 legislative rules or, in the absence of applicable legislative
475 rules, by the chair of the Legislative Auditing Committee with
Page 19 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
476 the approval of the Legislative Auditing Committee and the
477 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
478 Representatives, or with the approval of the President of the
479 Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives if such
480 officer alone designated the Legislative Auditing Committee.
481 (c) If the Legislature is not in session when a witness
482 fails or refuses to comply with a lawful subpoena or subpoena
483 duces tecum issued pursuant to this subsection, the subpoena or
484 subpoena duces tecum may be enforced as provided in s. 11.143,
485 and the Public Integrity Division, on behalf of the committee
486 issuing the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, may file a
487 complaint before any circuit court of this state to enforce the
488 subpoena or subpoena duces tecum. Upon the filing of such
489 complaint, the court shall take jurisdiction of the witness and
490 the subject matter of the complaint and shall direct the witness
491 to respond to all lawful questions and to produce all lawfully
492 demanded documentary evidence in the possession of the witness.
493 The failure of a witness to comply with such order constitutes a
494 direct and criminal contempt of court and the court shall punish
495 the witness accordingly.
496 (d) When the Legislature is in session, upon request of
497 the Public Integrity Division directed to the committee issuing
498 the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, either house of the
499 Legislature may seek compliance with the subpoena or subpoena
500 duces tecum in accordance with the State Constitution, general
Page 20 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
501 law, the joint rules of the Legislature, or the rules of the
502 house of the Legislature whose committee issued the subpoena or
503 subpoena duces tecum.
504 (6) The Public Integrity Division shall receive copies of
505 all reports required by ss. 14.32, 17.325, and 20.055.
506 (7)(a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the
507 Auditor General and the Public Integrity Division, within
508 available resources, shall randomly select and review
509 appropriations projects appropriated in the prior fiscal year
510 and, if appropriate, investigate and recommend an audit of such
511 projects. The review, investigation, or audit may be delayed on
512 a selected project until a subsequent year if the timeline of
513 the project warrants such delay. Each review, investigation, or
514 audit must include, but is not limited to, an evaluation of the
515 appropriations project recipient's efficient and effective
516 administration of the project. When an audit is recommended by
517 the Public Integrity Division under this subsection, the Auditor
518 General shall determine whether the audit is appropriate. All
519 such determinations shall be reported to the Joint Legislative
520 Auditing Committee.
521 (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the Auditor
522 General and the Public Integrity Division, within available
523 resources, may select and review, investigate, or audit the
524 financial activities of any political subdivision, special
525 district, public authority, public hospital, state or local
Page 21 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
526 council or commission, unit of local government, or public
527 education entity in this state, as well as any authority,
528 council, commission, direct-support organization, institution,
529 foundation, or similar entity created by law or ordinance to
530 pursue a public purpose, entitled by law or ordinance to any
531 distribution of tax or fee revenues, or organized for the sole
532 purpose of supporting one of the public entities listed in this
533 paragraph.
534 Section 6. Section 11.407, Florida Statutes, is created to
535 read:
536 11.407 General Accountability Division audits.—
537 Beginning on January 1, 2027, the General Accountability
538 Division of the Florida Accountability Office shall conduct all
539 operational audits and compliance audits required by law,
540 including those previously assigned to the Auditor General or
541 the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
542 Accountability. The division may assist other units of the
543 Florida Accountability Office in conducting any audit or
544 investigation and conduct other audits authorized by law after
545 consultation with other units of the Florida Accountability
546 Office or as requested by the President of the Senate or the
547 Speaker of the House of Representatives.
548 Section 7. Section 11.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to
549 read:
550 11.42 The Auditor General.—
Page 22 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
551 (1) The Auditor General appointed in this section is the
552 auditor that is required by s. 2, Art. III of the State
553 Constitution.
554 (1)(2) The Auditor General shall be appointed to office to
555 serve at the pleasure of the Legislature, by a majority vote of
556 the members of the Legislative Auditing Committee, subject to
557 confirmation by both houses of the Legislature. At the time of
558 her or his appointment, the Auditor General shall have been
559 certified under the Public Accountancy Law in this state for a
560 period of at least 10 years and shall have had not less than 10
561 years' experience in an accounting or auditing related field.
562 Vacancies in the office shall be filled in the same manner as
563 the original appointment.
564 (3)(a) To carry out her or his duties the Auditor General
565 shall make all spending decisions within the annual operating
566 budget approved by the President of the Senate and the Speaker
567 of the House of Representatives. The Auditor General shall
568 employ qualified persons necessary for the efficient operation
569 of the Auditor General's office and shall fix their duties and
570 compensation and, with the approval of the President of the
571 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, shall
572 adopt and administer a uniform personnel, job classification,
573 and pay plan for such employees.
574 (2)(b) No person shall be employed as a financial auditor
575 who does not possess the qualifications to take the examination
Page 23 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
576 for a certificate as certified public accountant under the laws
577 of this state, and no person shall be employed or retained as
578 legal adviser, on either a full-time or a part-time basis, who
579 is not a member of The Florida Bar.
580 (3)(4) The Auditor General, before entering upon the
581 duties of the office, shall take and subscribe the oath of
582 office required of state officers by the State Constitution.
583 (5) The appointment of the Auditor General may be
584 terminated at any time by a majority vote of both houses of the
585 Legislature.
586 (6)(a) The headquarters of the Auditor General shall be at
587 the state capital, but to facilitate auditing and to eliminate
588 unnecessary traveling the Auditor General may establish field
589 offices located outside the state capital. The Auditor General
590 shall be provided with adequate quarters to carry out the
591 position's functions in the state capital and in other areas of
592 the state.
593 (b) All payrolls and vouchers for the operations of the
594 Auditor General's office shall be submitted to the Chief
595 Financial Officer and, if found to be correct, payments shall be
596 issued therefor.
597 (4)(7) The Auditor General, in consultation with the units
598 of the Florida Accountability Office, may make and enforce
599 reasonable rules and regulations necessary to facilitate audits
600 which the Florida Accountability Office she or he is authorized
Page 24 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
601 to perform. The Auditor General shall consult with other units
602 of the Florida Accountability Office and incorporate into such
603 rules the suggestions of each unit that may lead to more timely
604 and effective audits, examinations, and investigations.
605 (8) No officer or salaried employee of the Office of the
606 Auditor General shall serve as the representative of any
607 political party or on any executive committee or other governing
608 body thereof; serve as an executive, officer, or employee of any
609 political party committee, organization, or association; or be
610 engaged on behalf of any candidate for public office in the
611 solicitation of votes or other activities in behalf of such
612 candidacy. Neither the Auditor General nor any employee of the
613 Auditor General may become a candidate for election to public
614 office unless she or he first resigns from office or employment.
615 No officer or salaried employee of the Auditor General shall
616 actively engage in any other business or profession or be
617 otherwise employed without the prior written permission of the
618 Auditor General.
619 (9) Sections 11.25(1) and 11.26 shall not apply to the
620 Auditor General.
621 Section 8. Section 11.45, Florida Statutes, is amended to
622 read:
623 11.45 Definitions; duties; authorities; reports; rules.—
624 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in ss. 11.40-11.51, the term:
625 (a) "Abuse" means behavior that is deficient or improper
Page 25 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
626 when compared with behavior that a prudent person would consider
627 a reasonable and necessary operational practice given the facts
628 and circumstances. The term includes the misuse of authority or
629 position for personal gain.
630 (b) "Audit" means a financial audit, operational audit, or
631 performance audit.
632 (c) "Compliance audit" means an operational audit or a
633 performance audit directed at the systems and processes,
634 governance, legal compliance, regulations, and contracts of an
635 agency, a program, or an activity, as well as any other
636 objectives specified by the entity requesting or directing the
637 examination.
638 (d)(c) "County agency" means a board of county
639 commissioners or other legislative and governing body of a
640 county, however styled, including that of a consolidated or
641 metropolitan government, a clerk of the circuit court, a
642 separate or ex officio clerk of the county court, a sheriff, a
643 property appraiser, a tax collector, a supervisor of elections,
644 or any other officer in whom any portion of the fiscal duties of
645 a body or officer expressly stated in this paragraph are
646 separately placed by law.
647 (e)(d) "Financial audit" means an examination of financial
648 statements in order to express an opinion on the fairness with
649 which they are presented in conformity with generally accepted
650 accounting principles and an examination to determine whether
Page 26 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
651 operations are properly conducted in accordance with legal and
652 regulatory requirements. Financial audits must be conducted in
653 accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the
654 United States and government auditing standards. When
655 applicable, the scope of financial audits must encompass the
656 additional activities necessary to establish compliance with the
657 Single Audit Act Amendments of 1996, 31 U.S.C. ss. 7501-7507,
658 and other applicable federal law.
659 (f)(e) "Fraud" means obtaining something of value through
660 willful misrepresentation, including, but not limited to,
661 intentional misstatements or intentional omissions of amounts or
662 disclosures in financial statements to deceive users of
663 financial statements, theft of an entity's assets, bribery, or
664 the use of one's position for personal enrichment through the
665 deliberate misuse or misapplication of an organization's
666 resources.
667 (g)(f) "Governmental entity" means a state agency, a
668 county agency, or any other entity, however styled, that
669 independently exercises any type of state or local governmental
670 function.
671 (h)(g) "Local governmental entity" means a county agency,
672 municipality, tourist development council, county tourism
673 promotion agency, or special district as defined in s. 189.012.
674 The term does not include any housing authority established
675 under chapter 421.
Page 27 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
676 (i)(h) "Management letter" means a statement of the
677 auditor's comments and recommendations.
678 (j)(i) "Operational audit" means an audit whose purpose is
679 to evaluate management's performance in establishing and
680 maintaining internal controls, including controls designed to
681 prevent and detect fraud, waste, and abuse, and in administering
682 assigned responsibilities in accordance with applicable laws,
683 administrative rules, contracts, grant agreements, and other
684 guidelines. Operational audits must be conducted in accordance
685 with government auditing standards or include a written
686 explanation for any departures from such standards in the audit
687 report. Such audits examine internal controls that are designed
688 and placed in operation to promote and encourage the achievement
689 of management's control objectives in the categories of
690 compliance, economic and efficient operations, reliability of
691 financial records and reports, and safeguarding of assets, and
692 identify weaknesses in those internal controls.
693 (k)(j) "Performance audit" means an examination of a
694 program, activity, or function of a governmental entity,
695 conducted in accordance with applicable government auditing
696 standards or auditing and evaluation standards of other
697 appropriate authoritative bodies. The term includes an
698 examination of issues related to:
699 1. Economy, efficiency, or effectiveness of the program.
700 2. Structure or design of the program to accomplish its
Page 28 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
701 goals and objectives.
702 3. Adequacy of the program to meet the needs identified by
703 the Legislature or governing body.
704 4. Alternative methods of providing program services or
705 products.
706 5. Goals, objectives, and performance measures used by the
707 agency to monitor and report program accomplishments.
708 6. The accuracy or adequacy of public documents, reports,
709 or requests prepared under the program by state agencies.
710 7. Compliance of the program with appropriate policies,
711 rules, or laws.
712 8. Any other issues related to governmental entities as
713 directed by the Legislative Auditing Committee.
714 (l)(k) "Political subdivision" means a separate agency or
715 unit of local government created or established by law and
716 includes, but is not limited to, the following and the officers
717 thereof: authority, board, branch, bureau, city, commission,
718 consolidated government, county, department, district,
719 institution, metropolitan government, municipality, office,
720 officer, public corporation, town, or village.
721 (m)(l) "State agency" means a separate agency or unit of
722 state government created or established by law and includes, but
723 is not limited to, the following and the officers thereof:
724 authority, board, branch, bureau, commission, department,
725 division, institution, office, officer, or public corporation,
Page 29 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
726 as the case may be, except any such agency or unit within the
727 legislative branch of state government other than the Florida
728 Public Service Commission.
729 (n)(m) "Waste" means the act of using or expending
730 resources unreasonably, carelessly, extravagantly, or for no
731 useful purpose.
732 (2) DUTIES.—The Florida Accountability Office Auditor
733 General shall:
734 (a) Conduct audits of records and perform related duties
735 as prescribed by law, concurrent resolution of the Legislature,
736 or as directed by the Legislative Auditing Committee.
737 (b) Annually conduct a financial audit of state
738 government.
739 (c) Annually conduct financial audits of all state
740 universities and Florida College System institutions and verify
741 the accuracy of the amounts certified by each state university
742 and Florida College System institution chief financial officer
743 pursuant to ss. 1011.45 and 1011.84.
744 (d) Annually conduct financial audits of the accounts and
745 records of all district school boards in counties with
746 populations of less than 150,000, according to the most recent
747 federal decennial statewide census; and the Florida School for
748 the Deaf and the Blind.
749 (e) Once every 3 years, conduct financial audits of the
750 accounts and records of all district school boards in counties
Page 30 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
751 that have populations of 150,000 or more, according to the most
752 recent federal decennial statewide census.
753 (f) At least every 3 years, conduct operational audits of
754 the accounts and records of state agencies, state universities,
755 state colleges, district school boards, the Florida Clerks of
756 Court Operations Corporation, water management districts, and
757 the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind.
758 (g) At least every 3 years, conduct a performance audit of
759 the local government financial reporting system, which, for the
760 purpose of this chapter, means any statutory provision related
761 to local government financial reporting. The purpose of such an
762 audit is to determine the accuracy, efficiency, and
763 effectiveness of the reporting system in achieving its goals and
764 to make recommendations to the local governments, the Governor,
765 and the Legislature as to how the reporting system can be
766 improved and how program costs can be reduced. The Office of
767 Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability Auditor
768 General shall determine the scope of the audits. The local
769 government financial reporting system should provide for the
770 timely, accurate, uniform, and cost-effective accumulation of
771 financial and other information that can be used by the members
772 of the Legislature and other appropriate officials to accomplish
773 the following goals:
774 1. Enhance citizen participation in local government;
775 2. Improve the financial condition of local governments;
Page 31 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
776 3. Provide essential government services in an efficient
777 and effective manner; and
778 4. Improve decisionmaking on the part of the Legislature,
779 state agencies, and local government officials on matters
780 relating to local government.
781 (h) At least every 3 years, conduct a performance audit of
782 the Department of Revenue's administration of the ad valorem tax
783 laws as described in s. 195.096. The audit report shall report
784 on the activities of the ad valorem tax program of the
785 Department of Revenue related to the ad valorem tax rolls. The
786 Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability
787 Auditor General shall include, for at least four counties
788 reviewed, findings as to the accuracy of assessment procedures,
789 projections, and computations made by the department, using the
790 same generally accepted appraisal standards and procedures to
791 which the department and the property appraisers are required to
792 adhere. However, the report may not include any findings or
793 statistics related to any ad valorem tax roll that is in
794 litigation between the state and county officials at the time
795 the report is issued.
796 (i) Once every 3 years, review a sample of internal audit
797 reports at each state agency, as defined in s. 20.055(1), to
798 determine compliance with current Standards for the Professional
799 Practice of Internal Auditing or, if appropriate, government
800 auditing standards.
Page 32 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
801 (j) Conduct audits of local governmental entities when
802 determined to be necessary by any unit of the Florida
803 Accountability Office the Auditor General, when directed by the
804 Legislative Auditing Committee, or when otherwise required by
805 law. No later than 18 months after the release of the audit
806 report, the applicable unit Auditor General shall perform such
807 appropriate followup procedures as he or she deems necessary to
808 determine the audited entity's progress in addressing the
809 findings and recommendations contained within the Auditor
810 General's previous report. The applicable unit Auditor General
811 shall notify each member of the audited entity's governing body
812 and the Legislative Auditing Committee of the results of its his
813 or her determination. For purposes of this paragraph, local
814 governmental entities do not include water management districts.
815 (k) Contact each district school board, as defined in s.
816 1003.01(7), with the findings and recommendations contained
817 within the Auditor General's previous operational audit report.
818 The district school board shall provide the Florida
819 Accountability Office Auditor General with evidence of the
820 initiation of corrective action within 45 days after the date it
821 is requested by the Florida Accountability Office Auditor
822 General and evidence of completion of corrective action within
823 180 days after the date it is requested by the Florida
824 Accountability Office Auditor General. If the district school
825 board fails to provide such evidence comply with the Auditor
Page 33 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
826 General's request or is unable to take corrective action within
827 the required timeframe, the Florida Accountability Office
828 Auditor General shall notify the Legislative Auditing Committee.
829 (l) At least once every 3 years, conduct operational
830 audits of the accounts and records of eligible nonprofit
831 scholarship-funding organizations receiving eligible
832 contributions under s. 1002.395, including any contracts for
833 services with related entities, to determine compliance with the
834 provisions of that section. Such audits shall include, but not
835 be limited to, a determination of the eligible nonprofit
836 scholarship-funding organization's compliance with s.
837 1002.395(6)(l). The Florida Accountability Office Auditor
838 General shall provide its report on the results of the audits to
839 the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the
840 House of Representatives, the Chief Financial Officer, and the
841 Legislative Auditing Committee, within 30 days after of
842 completion of the audit.
843 (m) At least once every 7 years, conduct an operational
844 and financial audit of each large-hub commercial service
845 airport. Each operational audit shall include, at a minimum, an
846 assessment of compliance with s. 332.0075, including compliance
847 with chapter 287, and compliance with the public records and
848 public meetings laws of this state. For purposes of this
849 paragraph, the term "large-hub commercial service airport" means
850 a publicly owned airport that has at least 1 percent of the
Page 34 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
851 annual passenger boardings in the United States as reported by
852 the Federal Aviation Administration.
853 (n) At least once every 3 years, conduct an operational
854 audit of the Florida Birth-Related Neurological Injury
855 Compensation Association. Each operational audit shall include,
856 at a minimum, an assessment of compliance with ss. 766.303-
857 766.315 and compliance with the public records and public
858 meetings laws of this state. The first operational audit must be
859 completed by August 15, 2021.
860
861 Each unit of the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
862 shall perform its his or her duties independently from an
863 audited entity, exercising objective and impartial judgment, but
864 under the general policies established by the Legislative
865 Auditing Committee or the Legislature. This subsection does not
866 limit the Florida Accountability Office's Auditor General's
867 discretionary authority to conduct other audits or engagements
868 of governmental entities as authorized in subsection (3).
869 (3) AUTHORITY FOR AUDITS AND OTHER ENGAGEMENTS.—Any unit
870 of the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General may,
871 pursuant to its his or her own discretion authority, or at the
872 direction of the Legislative Auditing Committee, the President
873 of the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
874 conduct audits or other engagements as determined appropriate by
875 the unit Auditor General of:
Page 35 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
876 (a) The accounts and records of any governmental entity
877 created or established by law.
878 (b) The information technology programs, activities,
879 functions, or systems of any governmental entity created or
880 established by law.
881 (c) The accounts and records of any charter school created
882 or established by law.
883 (d) The accounts and records of any direct-support
884 organization or citizen support organization created or
885 established by law. The Florida Accountability Office Auditor
886 General is authorized to require and receive any records from
887 the direct-support organization or citizen support organization,
888 or from its independent auditor.
889 (e) The public records associated with any appropriation
890 made by the Legislature to a nongovernmental agency,
891 corporation, or person. All records of a nongovernmental agency,
892 corporation, or person with respect to the receipt and
893 expenditure of such an appropriation shall be public records and
894 shall be treated in the same manner as other public records are
895 under general law.
896 (f) State financial assistance provided to any nonstate
897 entity as defined by s. 215.97.
898 (g) The Tobacco Settlement Financing Corporation created
899 pursuant to s. 215.56005.
900 (h) Any purchases of federal surplus lands for use as
Page 36 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
901 sites for correctional facilities as described in s. 253.037.
902 (i) The Florida Development Finance Corporation or the
903 capital development board or the programs or entities created by
904 the board. The audit or report may not reveal the identity of
905 any person who has anonymously made a donation to the board
906 pursuant to this paragraph. The identity of a donor or
907 prospective donor to the board who desires to remain anonymous
908 and all information identifying such donor or prospective donor
909 are confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1)
910 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Such anonymity
911 shall be maintained in the auditor's report.
912 (j) The records pertaining to the use of funds from
913 voluntary contributions on a motor vehicle registration
914 application or on a driver license application authorized
915 pursuant to ss. 320.023 and 322.081.
916 (k) The records pertaining to the use of funds from the
917 sale of specialty license plates described in chapter 320.
918 (l) The acquisitions and divestitures related to the
919 Florida Communities Trust Program created pursuant to chapter
920 380.
921 (m) The Florida Water Pollution Control Financing
922 Corporation created pursuant to s. 403.1837.
923 (n) The school readiness program, including the early
924 learning coalitions under part VI of chapter 1002.
925 (o) CareerSource Florida, Inc., the state board as defined
Page 37 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
926 in s. 445.002, or the programs or entities created by the state
927 board under s. 445.004.
928 (p) The corporation defined in s. 455.32 that is under
929 contract with the Department of Business and Professional
930 Regulation to provide administrative, investigative,
931 examination, licensing, and prosecutorial support services in
932 accordance with the provisions of s. 455.32 and the practice act
933 of the relevant profession.
934 (q) The Florida Engineers Management Corporation created
935 pursuant to chapter 471.
936 (r) The books and records of any permitholder that
937 conducts race meetings or jai alai exhibitions under chapter
938 550.
939 (s) The corporation defined in part II of chapter 946,
940 known as the Prison Rehabilitative Industries and Diversified
941 Enterprises, Inc., or PRIDE Enterprises.
942 (t) The Florida Virtual School.
943 (u) Virtual education providers receiving state funds or
944 funds from local ad valorem taxes.
945 (v) The accounts and records of a nonprofit scholarship-
946 funding organization participating in a state sponsored
947 scholarship program authorized by chapter 1002.
948 (w) The Florida Tourism Industry Marketing Corporation.
949 (x) Tourist development councils and county tourism
950 promotion agencies.
Page 38 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
951 (4) SCHEDULING AND STAFFING OF AUDITS.—
952 (a) Each financial audit required or authorized by this
953 section, when practicable, shall be made and completed within
954 not more than 9 months following the end of each audited fiscal
955 year of the state agency or political subdivision, or at such
956 lesser time which may be provided by law or concurrent
957 resolution or directed by the Legislative Auditing Committee.
958 When the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
959 determines that conducting any audit or engagement otherwise
960 required by law would not be possible due to workload or would
961 not be an efficient or effective use of its his or her resources
962 based on an assessment of risk, then, in its his or her
963 discretion, the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
964 may temporarily or indefinitely postpone such audits or other
965 engagements for such period or any portion thereof, unless
966 otherwise directed by the committee.
967 (b) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General may,
968 when in his or her judgment it is necessary, designate and
969 direct any auditor employed by the Florida Accountability Office
970 Auditor General to audit any accounts or records within the
971 authority of the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
972 to audit. The auditor shall report his or her findings for
973 review by the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General,
974 which who shall prepare the audit report.
975 (c) The audit report when final shall be a public record.
Page 39 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
976 The audit workpapers and notes are not a public record; however,
977 those workpapers necessary to support the computations in the
978 final audit report may be made available by a majority vote of
979 the Legislative Auditing Committee after a public hearing
980 showing proper cause. The audit workpapers and notes shall be
981 retained by the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
982 until no longer useful in its his or her proper functions, after
983 which time they may be destroyed.
984 (d) At the conclusion of the audit, examination, or
985 investigation, the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
986 or the designated representative of the Florida Accountability
987 Office Auditor General's designated representative shall discuss
988 the audit, examination, or investigation with the official whose
989 office is subject to audit and submit to that official a list of
990 the Florida Accountability Office's Auditor General's findings
991 which may be included in the audit report. If the official is
992 not available for receipt of the list of audit findings, then
993 delivery is presumed to be made when it is delivered to his or
994 her office. The official shall submit to the Florida
995 Accountability Office Auditor General or the designated
996 representative, within 30 days after the receipt of the list of
997 findings, or within 15 days if specified in writing with the
998 delivery of the findings, his or her written statement of
999 explanation or rebuttal concerning all of the findings,
1000 including corrective action to be taken to preclude a recurrence
Page 40 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1001 of all findings.
1002 (e) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1003 shall provide the successor independent certified public
1004 accountant of a district school board with access to the prior
1005 year's working papers in accordance with the Statements on
1006 Auditing Standards, including documentation of planning,
1007 internal control, audit results, and other matters of continuing
1008 accounting and auditing significance, such as the working paper
1009 analysis of balance sheet accounts and those relating to
1010 contingencies.
1011 (5) PETITION FOR AN AUDIT BY THE FLORIDA ACCOUNTABILITY
1012 OFFICE AUDITOR GENERAL.—
1013 (a) The Legislative Auditing Committee shall direct the
1014 Florida Accountability Office Auditor General to make an audit
1015 of any municipality whenever petitioned to do so by at least 20
1016 percent of the registered electors in the last general election
1017 of that municipality pursuant to this subsection. The supervisor
1018 of elections of the county in which the municipality is located
1019 shall certify whether or not the petition contains the
1020 signatures of at least 20 percent of the registered electors of
1021 the municipality. After the completion of the audit, the Florida
1022 Accountability Office Auditor General shall determine whether
1023 the municipality has the fiscal resources necessary to pay the
1024 cost of the audit. The municipality shall pay the cost of the
1025 audit within 90 days after the Florida Accountability Office's
Page 41 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1026 Auditor General's determination that the municipality has the
1027 available resources. If the municipality fails to pay the cost
1028 of the audit, the Department of Revenue shall, upon
1029 certification of the Florida Accountability Office Auditor
1030 General, withhold from that portion of the distribution pursuant
1031 to s. 212.20(6)(d)5. which is distributable to such
1032 municipality, a sum sufficient to pay the cost of the audit and
1033 shall deposit that sum into the General Revenue Fund of the
1034 state.
1035 (b) At least one registered elector in the most recent
1036 general election must file a letter of intent with the municipal
1037 clerk before prior to any petition of the electors of that
1038 municipality for the purpose of an audit. Each petition must be
1039 submitted to the supervisor of elections and contain, at a
1040 minimum:
1041 1. The elector's printed name;
1042 2. The signature of the elector;
1043 3. The elector's residence address;
1044 4. The elector's date of birth; and
1045 5. The date signed.
1046
1047 All petitions must be submitted for verification within 1
1048 calendar year after the audit petition origination by the
1049 municipal electors.
1050 (6) REQUEST BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY FOR AN AUDIT BY
Page 42 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1051 THE FLORIDA ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE AUDITOR GENERAL.—Whenever a
1052 local governmental entity requests the Florida Accountability
1053 Office Auditor General to conduct an audit of all or part of its
1054 operations and the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1055 conducts the audit under its his or her own authority or at the
1056 direction of the Legislative Auditing Committee, the expenses of
1057 the audit shall be paid by the local governmental entity. The
1058 Florida Accountability Office Auditor General shall estimate the
1059 cost of the audit. Fifty percent of the cost estimate shall be
1060 paid by the local governmental entity before the initiation of
1061 the audit and deposited into the General Revenue Fund of the
1062 state. After the completion of the audit, the Florida
1063 Accountability Office Auditor General shall notify the local
1064 governmental entity of the actual cost of the audit. The local
1065 governmental entity shall remit the remainder of the cost of the
1066 audit to the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General for
1067 deposit into the General Revenue Fund of this the state. If the
1068 local governmental entity fails to comply with paying the
1069 remaining cost of the audit, the Florida Accountability Office
1070 Auditor General shall notify the Legislative Auditing Committee.
1071 (7) FLORIDA ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE AUDITOR GENERAL
1072 REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.—
1073 (a) The Auditor General shall notify the Legislative
1074 Auditing Committee of any local governmental entity, district
1075 school board, charter school, or charter technical career center
Page 43 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1076 that does not comply with the reporting requirements of s.
1077 218.39.
1078 (b) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General, in
1079 consultation with the Board of Accountancy, shall review all
1080 audit reports submitted pursuant to s. 218.39. The Auditor
1081 General shall request any significant items that were omitted in
1082 violation of a rule adopted by the Auditor General. The items
1083 must be provided within 45 days after the date of the request.
1084 If the governmental entity does not comply with the Auditor
1085 General's request, the Auditor General shall notify the
1086 Legislative Auditing Committee.
1087 (c) The Auditor General shall provide annually a list of
1088 those special districts which are not in compliance with s.
1089 218.39 to the Special District Accountability Program of the
1090 Department of Commerce.
1091 (d) During the Florida Accountability Office's Auditor
1092 General's review of audit reports, it he or she shall contact
1093 those units of local government, as defined in s. 218.403, that
1094 are not in compliance with s. 218.415 and request evidence of
1095 corrective action. The unit of local government shall provide
1096 the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General with evidence
1097 of corrective action within 45 days after the date it is
1098 requested by the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General.
1099 If the unit of local government fails to comply with the Florida
1100 Accountability Office's Auditor General's request, the Florida
Page 44 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1101 Accountability Office Auditor General shall notify the
1102 Legislative Auditing Committee.
1103 (e) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1104 shall notify the Governor or the Commissioner of Education, as
1105 appropriate, and the Legislative Auditing Committee of any audit
1106 report reviewed by the office Auditor General pursuant to
1107 paragraph (b) which contains a statement that a local
1108 governmental entity, charter school, charter technical career
1109 center, or district school board has met one or more of the
1110 conditions specified in s. 218.503. If the Auditor General
1111 requests a clarification regarding information included in an
1112 audit report to determine whether a local governmental entity,
1113 charter school, charter technical career center, or district
1114 school board has met one or more of the conditions specified in
1115 s. 218.503, the requested clarification must be provided within
1116 45 days after the date of the request. If the local governmental
1117 entity, charter school, charter technical career center, or
1118 district school board does not comply with the Florida
1119 Accountability Office's Auditor General's request, the office
1120 Auditor General shall notify the Legislative Auditing Committee.
1121 If, after obtaining the requested clarification, the Florida
1122 Accountability Office Auditor General determines that the local
1123 governmental entity, charter school, charter technical career
1124 center, or district school board has met one or more of the
1125 conditions specified in s. 218.503, the office he or she shall
Page 45 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1126 notify the Governor or the Commissioner of Education, as
1127 appropriate, and the Legislative Auditing Committee.
1128 (f) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1129 shall annually compile and transmit to the President of the
1130 Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the
1131 Legislative Auditing Committee a summary of significant findings
1132 and financial trends identified in audit reports reviewed in
1133 paragraph (b) or otherwise identified by the Florida
1134 Accountability Office's Auditor General's review of such audit
1135 reports and financial information, and identified in audits of
1136 district school boards conducted by the office Auditor General.
1137 The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General shall include
1138 financial information provided pursuant to s. 218.32(1)(e) for
1139 entities with fiscal years ending on or after June 30, 2003,
1140 within the office's his or her reports submitted pursuant to
1141 this paragraph.
1142 (g) If the Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1143 discovers significant errors, improper practices, or other
1144 significant discrepancies in connection with its his or her
1145 audits of a state agency or state officer, the Florida
1146 Accountability Office Auditor General shall notify the President
1147 of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and
1148 the Legislative Auditing Committee. The President of the Senate
1149 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall promptly
1150 forward a copy of the notification to the chairs of the
Page 46 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1151 respective legislative committees, which in the judgment of the
1152 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
1153 Representatives are substantially concerned with the functions
1154 of the state agency or state officer involved. Thereafter, and
1155 in no event later than the 10th day of the next succeeding
1156 legislative session, the person in charge of the state agency
1157 involved, or the state officer involved, as the case may be,
1158 shall explain in writing to the President of the Senate, the
1159 Speaker of the House of Representatives, and to the Legislative
1160 Auditing Committee the reasons or justifications for such
1161 errors, improper practices, or other significant discrepancies
1162 and the corrective measures, if any, taken by the agency.
1163 (h) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1164 shall annually compile and transmit to the President of the
1165 Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the
1166 Legislative Auditing Committee by December 1 of each year a
1167 report that includes a projected 2-year work plan identifying
1168 the audit and other accountability activities to be undertaken
1169 and a list of statutory and fiscal changes recommended by the
1170 Florida Accountability Office Auditor General. The Florida
1171 Accountability Office Auditor General may also transmit
1172 recommendations at other times of the year when the information
1173 would be timely and useful for the Legislature.
1174 (i) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1175 shall annually transmit by July 15, to the President of the
Page 47 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1176 Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the
1177 Department of Financial Services, a list of all school
1178 districts, charter schools, charter technical career centers,
1179 Florida College System institutions, state universities, and
1180 local governmental entities that have failed to comply with the
1181 transparency requirements as identified in the audit reports
1182 reviewed pursuant to paragraph (b) and those conducted pursuant
1183 to subsection (2).
1184 (j) The Florida Accountability Office Auditor General
1185 shall notify the Legislative Auditing Committee of any financial
1186 or operational audit report prepared pursuant to this section
1187 which indicates that a district school board, state university,
1188 or Florida College System institution has failed to take full
1189 corrective action in response to a recommendation that was
1190 included in the two preceding financial reports or any preceding
1191 operational audit report reports.
1192 1. The committee may direct the district school board or
1193 the governing body of the state university or Florida College
1194 System institution to provide a written statement to the
1195 committee explaining why full corrective action has not been
1196 taken or, if the governing body intends to take full corrective
1197 action, describing the corrective action to be taken and when it
1198 will occur.
1199 2. If the committee determines that the written statement
1200 is not sufficient, the committee may require the chair of the
Page 48 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1201 district school board or the chair of the governing body of the
1202 state university or Florida College System institution, or the
1203 chair's designee, to appear before the committee.
1204 3. If the committee determines that the district school
1205 board, state university, or Florida College System institution
1206 has failed to take full corrective action for which there is no
1207 justifiable reason or has failed to comply with committee
1208 requests made pursuant to this section, the committee shall
1209 refer the matter to the State Board of Education or the Board of
1210 Governors, as appropriate, to proceed in accordance with s.
1211 1008.32 or s. 1008.322, respectively.
1212 (8) RULES OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL.—The Auditor General, in
1213 consultation with the Board of Accountancy, shall adopt rules
1214 for the form and conduct of all financial audits performed by
1215 independent certified public accountants pursuant to ss.
1216 215.981, 218.39, 1001.453, 1002.395, 1004.28, and 1004.70. The
1217 rules for audits of local governmental entities, charter
1218 schools, charter technical career centers, and district school
1219 boards must include, but are not limited to, requirements for
1220 the reporting of information necessary to carry out the purposes
1221 of the Local Governmental Entity, Charter School, Charter
1222 Technical Career Center, and District School Board Financial
1223 Emergencies Act as stated in s. 218.501.
1224 (9) TECHNICAL ADVICE PROVIDED BY THE AUDITOR GENERAL.—The
1225 Auditor General may provide technical advice to:
Page 49 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1226 (a) The Department of Education in the development of a
1227 compliance supplement for the financial audit of a district
1228 school board conducted by an independent certified public
1229 accountant.
1230 (b) Governmental entities on their financial and
1231 accounting systems, procedures, and related matters.
1232 (c) Governmental entities on promoting the building of
1233 competent and efficient accounting and internal audit
1234 organizations in their offices.
1235 Section 9. Section 11.47, Florida Statutes, is amended to
1236 read:
1237 11.47 Penalties; failure to make a proper audit or
1238 examination; making a false report; failure to produce documents
1239 or information.—
1240 (1) All officers whose respective offices the Florida
1241 Accountability Office Auditor General or the Office of Program
1242 Policy Analysis and Government Accountability is authorized to
1243 audit or examine shall enter into their public records
1244 sufficient information for proper audit or examination, and
1245 shall make the same available to the Florida Accountability
1246 Office Auditor General or the Office of Program Policy Analysis
1247 and Government Accountability on demand.
1248 (2) The willful failure or refusal of the Auditor General,
1249 director of the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
1250 Accountability, or any staff employed by the Florida
Page 50 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1251 Accountability Office Auditor General or the Office of Program
1252 Policy Analysis and Government Accountability to make a proper
1253 audit or examination in line with its his or her duty, the
1254 willful making of a false report as to any audit or examination,
1255 or the willful failure or refusal to report a shortage or
1256 misappropriation of funds or property shall be cause for removal
1257 from such office or employment, and the Auditor General, the
1258 director of the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
1259 Accountability, or a staff member commits shall be guilty of a
1260 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
1261 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1262 (3) Any person who willfully fails or refuses to provide
1263 access to an employee, officer, or agent of an entity subject to
1264 an audit or to furnish or produce any book, record, paper,
1265 document, data, or sufficient information necessary to a proper
1266 audit or examination which the Florida Accountability Office,
1267 Auditor General, or the Office of Program Policy Analysis and
1268 Government Accountability is by law authorized to perform
1269 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as
1270 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1271 (4) Any officer who willfully fails or refuses to furnish
1272 or produce any book, record, paper, document, data, or
1273 sufficient information necessary to a proper audit or
1274 examination which the Florida Accountability Office, Auditor
1275 General, or the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
Page 51 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1276 Accountability is by law authorized to perform, shall be subject
1277 to removal from office.
1278 Section 10. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 11.51,
1279 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1280 11.51 Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
1281 Accountability.—
1282 (1) The Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
1283 Accountability is authorized to examine all entities and records
1284 listed in s. 11.45(3).
1285 (2) At the conclusion of an examination, the designated
1286 representative of the Office of Program Policy Analysis and
1287 Government Accountability shall discuss the examination with the
1288 official whose office is examined and submit to that official
1289 the Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government
1290 Accountability's preliminary findings. If the official is not
1291 available for receipt of the preliminary findings, clearly
1292 designated as such, delivery thereof is presumed to be made when
1293 it is delivered to his or her office. Whenever necessary, the
1294 Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government Accountability
1295 may request the official to submit his or her written statement
1296 of explanation or rebuttal within 15 days after the receipt of
1297 the findings. If the response time is not requested to be within
1298 15 days, the official shall submit his or her response within 30
1299 days after receipt of the preliminary findings.
1300 Section 11. Paragraph (g) of subsection (2) of section
Page 52 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1301 14.32, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1302 14.32 Office of Chief Inspector General.—
1303 (2) The Chief Inspector General shall:
1304 (g) Report expeditiously to and cooperate fully with the
1305 Department of Law Enforcement, the Chief Financial Officer, the
1306 Department of Legal Affairs, and any other law enforcement
1307 agency believed to have jurisdiction agencies when there are
1308 recognizable grounds to believe that there has been a violation
1309 of criminal law or that a civil action should be initiated.
1310 Section 12. Subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of
1311 section 112.3187, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1312 112.3187 Adverse action against employee for disclosing
1313 information of specified nature prohibited; employee remedy and
1314 relief.—
1315 (1) SHORT TITLE.—Sections 112.3187-112.31901 112.3187-
1316 112.31895 may be cited as the "Whistle-blower's Act."
1317 (2) LEGISLATIVE INTENT.—It is the intent of the
1318 Legislature to prevent agencies or independent contractors from
1319 taking retaliatory action against an employee who reports to an
1320 appropriate agency violations of law on the part of a public
1321 employer or independent contractor that create a substantial and
1322 specific danger to the public's health, safety, or welfare. It
1323 is further the intent of the Legislature to prevent agencies or
1324 independent contractors from taking retaliatory action against
1325 any person who discloses information to an appropriate agency
Page 53 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1326 alleging improper use of governmental office, gross waste of
1327 funds, or any other abuse or gross neglect of duty on the part
1328 of an agency, public officer, or employee.
1329 (5) NATURE OF INFORMATION DISCLOSED.—The information
1330 disclosed under this section must include:
1331 (a) Any violation or suspected violation of any federal,
1332 state, or local law, rule, or regulation committed by an
1333 employee or agent of an agency or independent contractor which
1334 creates and presents a substantial and specific danger to the
1335 public's health, safety, or welfare.
1336 (b) Any act or suspected act of gross mismanagement,
1337 malfeasance, misfeasance, gross waste of public funds, suspected
1338 or actual Medicaid fraud or abuse, or gross neglect of duty
1339 committed by an employee or agent of an agency or independent
1340 contractor.
1341 (6) TO WHOM INFORMATION DISCLOSED.—The information
1342 disclosed under this section must be disclosed to any agency or
1343 federal government entity having the authority to investigate,
1344 police, manage, or otherwise remedy the violation or act,
1345 including, but not limited to, the Florida Accountability
1346 Office, the Office of the Chief Inspector General, an agency
1347 inspector general or the employee designated as agency inspector
1348 general under s. 112.3189(1) or inspectors general under s.
1349 20.055, the Florida Commission on Human Relations, and the
1350 whistle-blower's hotline created under s. 112.3189. However, for
Page 54 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1351 disclosures concerning a local governmental entity, including
1352 any regional, county, or municipal entity, special district,
1353 community college district, or school district or any political
1354 subdivision of any of the foregoing, the information must be
1355 disclosed to a chief executive officer as defined in s.
1356 447.203(9) or other appropriate local official.
1357 (7) EMPLOYEES AND PERSONS PROTECTED.—This section protects
1358 employees and persons who disclose information on their own
1359 initiative in a written and signed complaint; who are requested
1360 to participate in an investigation, hearing, or other inquiry
1361 conducted by the Florida Accountability Office or any agency or
1362 federal government entity; who refuse to participate in any
1363 adverse action prohibited by this section; or who initiate a
1364 complaint through the whistle-blower's hotline, or the hotline
1365 of the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Department of Legal
1366 Affairs, or any communication to the Florida Accountability
1367 Office; or employees who file any written complaint to their
1368 supervisory officials or employees who submit a complaint to the
1369 Florida Accountability Office, the Chief Inspector General in
1370 the Executive Office of the Governor, to the employee designated
1371 as agency inspector general under s. 112.3189(1), or to the
1372 Florida Commission on Human Relations. The provisions of This
1373 section may not be used by a person while he or she is under the
1374 care, custody, or control of the state correctional system or,
1375 after release from the care, custody, or control of the state
Page 55 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1376 correctional system, with respect to circumstances that occurred
1377 during any period of incarceration. No remedy or other
1378 protection under ss. 112.3187-112.31895 applies to any person
1379 who has committed or intentionally participated in committing
1380 the violation or suspected violation for which protection under
1381 ss. 112.3187-112.31895 is being sought.
1382 Section 13. Section 112.3188, Florida Statutes, is amended
1383 to read:
1384 112.3188 Confidentiality of information given to the
1385 Florida Accountability Office, the Chief Inspector General,
1386 internal auditors, inspectors general, local chief executive
1387 officers, or other appropriate local officials.—
1388 (1) The name or identity of any individual who discloses
1389 in good faith to the Florida Accountability Office, the Chief
1390 Inspector General or an agency inspector general, a local chief
1391 executive officer, or other appropriate local official
1392 information that alleges that an employee or agent of an agency
1393 or independent contractor:
1394 (a) Has violated or is suspected of having violated any
1395 federal, state, or local law, rule, or regulation, thereby
1396 creating and presenting a substantial and specific danger to the
1397 public's health, safety, or welfare; or
1398 (b) Has committed or is suspected of having committed an
1399 act of gross mismanagement, malfeasance, misfeasance, gross
1400 waste of public funds, or gross neglect of duty
Page 56 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1401
1402 may not be disclosed to anyone other than a member of the
1403 Florida Accountability Office, Chief Inspector General
1404 General's, agency inspector general general's, internal auditor
1405 auditor's, local chief executive officer officer's, or other
1406 appropriate local officer official's staff without the written
1407 consent of the individual, unless the Florida Accountability
1408 Office, Chief Inspector General, internal auditor, agency
1409 inspector general, local chief executive officer, or other
1410 appropriate local official determines that: the disclosure of
1411 the individual's identity is necessary to prevent a substantial
1412 and specific danger to the public's health, safety, or welfare
1413 or to prevent the imminent commission of a crime; or the
1414 disclosure is unavoidable and absolutely necessary during the
1415 course of the audit, evaluation, or investigation.
1416 (2)(a) Except as specifically authorized by s. 112.3189,
1417 all information received by the Florida Accountability Office,
1418 the Chief Inspector General, or an agency inspector general or
1419 information produced or derived from fact-finding or other
1420 investigations conducted by the Florida Commission on Human
1421 Relations or the Department of Law Enforcement is confidential
1422 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) if the information is being
1423 received or derived from allegations as set forth in paragraph
1424 (1)(a) or paragraph (1)(b), and an investigation is active.
1425 (b) All information received by a local chief executive
Page 57 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1426 officer or appropriate local official or information produced or
1427 derived from fact-finding or investigations conducted pursuant
1428 to the administrative procedure established by ordinance by a
1429 local government as authorized by s. 112.3187(8)(b) is
1430 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I
1431 of the State Constitution, if the information is being received
1432 or derived from allegations as set forth in paragraph (1)(a) or
1433 paragraph (1)(b) and an investigation is active.
1434 (c) Information deemed confidential under this section may
1435 be disclosed by the Florida Accountability Office, the Chief
1436 Inspector General, agency inspector general, local chief
1437 executive officer, or other appropriate local officer official
1438 receiving the information if the recipient determines that the
1439 disclosure of the information is absolutely necessary to prevent
1440 a substantial and specific danger to the public's health,
1441 safety, or welfare or to prevent the imminent commission of a
1442 crime. Information disclosed under this subsection may be
1443 disclosed only to persons who are in a position to prevent the
1444 danger to the public's health, safety, or welfare or to prevent
1445 the imminent commission of a crime based on the disclosed
1446 information.
1447 1. An investigation is active under this section if:
1448 a. It is an ongoing investigation or inquiry or collection
1449 of information and evidence and is continuing with a reasonable,
1450 good faith anticipation of resolution in the foreseeable future;
Page 58 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1451 or
1452 b. All or a portion of the matters under investigation or
1453 inquiry are active criminal intelligence information or active
1454 criminal investigative information as defined in s. 119.011.
1455 2. Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph 1.a., an investigation
1456 ceases to be active when:
1457 a. The written report required under s. 112.3189(9) has
1458 been sent by the Chief Inspector General to the recipients named
1459 in s. 112.3189(9);
1460 b. It is determined that an investigation is not necessary
1461 under s. 112.3189(5); or
1462 c. A final decision has been rendered by the local
1463 government or by the Division of Administrative Hearings
1464 pursuant to s. 112.3187(8)(b).
1465 3. Notwithstanding paragraphs (a), (b), and this
1466 paragraph, information or records received or produced under
1467 this section which are otherwise confidential under law or
1468 exempt from disclosure under chapter 119 retain their
1469 confidentiality or exemption.
1470 4. Any person who willfully and knowingly discloses
1471 information or records made confidential under this subsection
1472 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as
1473 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
1474 Section 14. Subsections (1) through (4), paragraph (b) of
1475 subsection (5), and paragraph (c) of subsection (9) of section
Page 59 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1476 112.3189, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1477 112.3189 Investigative procedures upon receipt of whistle-
1478 blower information from certain state employees.—
1479 (1) This section only applies to the disclosure of
1480 information as described in s. 112.3187(5) by an employee or
1481 former employee of, or an applicant for employment with, a state
1482 agency, as the term "state agency" is defined in s. 216.011, to
1483 the Florida Accountability Office, of the Chief Inspector
1484 General of the Executive Office of the Governor, or to the
1485 agency inspector general. If an agency does not have an
1486 inspector general, the head of the state agency, as defined in
1487 s. 216.011, shall designate an employee to receive information
1488 described in s. 112.3187(5). For purposes of this section and s.
1489 112.3188 only, the employee designated by the head of the state
1490 agency shall be deemed an agency inspector general.
1491 (2) To facilitate the receipt of information described in
1492 subsection (1), the Chief Inspector General shall maintain an
1493 in-state toll-free whistle-blower's hotline and shall circulate
1494 among the various state agencies an advisory for all employees
1495 which indicates the existence of the toll-free number and its
1496 purpose and provides an address to which written whistle-blower
1497 information may be forwarded. At least once per month, an
1498 accurate summary of information received via the hotline shall
1499 be communicated to the Florida Accountability Office and
1500 maintained pursuant to s. 11.0431.
Page 60 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1501 (3) When a person alleges information described in s.
1502 112.3187(5), the Florida Accountability Office, the Chief
1503 Inspector General, or the agency inspector general actually
1504 receiving such information shall within 20 days after of
1505 receiving such information determine:
1506 (a) Whether the information disclosed is the type of
1507 information described in s. 112.3187(5).
1508 (b) Whether the source of the information is a person who
1509 is an employee or former employee of, or an applicant for
1510 employment with, a state agency, as defined in s. 216.011.
1511 (c) Whether the information actually disclosed
1512 demonstrates reasonable cause to suspect that an employee or
1513 agent of an agency or independent contractor has violated any
1514 federal, state, or local law, rule, or regulation, thereby
1515 creating and presenting a substantial and specific danger to the
1516 public's health, safety, or welfare, or has committed an act of
1517 gross mismanagement, malfeasance, misfeasance, gross waste of
1518 public funds, or gross neglect of duty.
1519 (4) If the Florida Accountability Office, the Chief
1520 Inspector General, or the agency inspector general under
1521 subsection (3) determines that the information disclosed is not
1522 the type of information described in s. 112.3187(5), or that the
1523 source of the information is not a person who is an employee or
1524 former employee of, or an applicant for employment with, a state
1525 agency, as defined in s. 216.011, or that the information
Page 61 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1526 disclosed does not demonstrate reasonable cause to suspect that
1527 an employee or agent of an agency or independent contractor has
1528 violated any federal, state, or local law, rule, or regulation,
1529 thereby creating and presenting a substantial and specific
1530 danger to the public's health, safety, or welfare, or has
1531 committed an act of gross mismanagement, malfeasance,
1532 misfeasance, gross waste of public funds, or gross neglect of
1533 duty, the Florida Accountability Office, the Chief Inspector
1534 General, or the agency inspector general shall notify the
1535 complainant of such fact and copy and return, upon request of
1536 the complainant, any documents and other materials that were
1537 provided by the complainant.
1538 (5)
1539 (b) If the Chief Inspector General or agency inspector
1540 general determines under paragraph (a) that an investigation is
1541 not required or not necessary, the Chief Inspector General or
1542 agency inspector general making such determination shall:
1543 1. Copy and return, upon request of the complainant, any
1544 documents and other materials provided by the individual who
1545 made the disclosure.
1546 2. Inform in writing the head of the state agency for the
1547 agency inspector general making the determination that the
1548 investigation is not necessary and the individual who made the
1549 disclosure of the specific reasons why an investigation is not
1550 necessary and why the disclosure will not be further acted on
Page 62 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1551 under this section.
1552 (9)
1553 (c) The Chief Inspector General shall transmit any final
1554 report under this section, any comments provided by the
1555 complainant, and any appropriate comments or recommendations by
1556 the Chief Inspector General to the Governor, the Legislative
1557 Auditing Committee, the Florida Accountability Office, the
1558 investigating agency, and the Chief Financial Officer.
1559 Section 15. Subsection (4) is added to section 112.31901,
1560 Florida Statutes, to read:
1561 112.31901 Investigatory records.—
1562 (4) This section shall not prevent the Florida
1563 Accountability Office from reviewing any records of any
1564 investigation under this section.
1565 Section 16. Paragraph (e) of subsection (5) of section
1566 112.3215, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1567 112.3215 Lobbying before the executive branch or the
1568 Constitution Revision Commission; registration and reporting;
1569 investigation by commission.—
1570 (5)
1571 (e) Each lobbying firm and each principal shall preserve
1572 for a period of 4 years all accounts, bills, receipts, computer
1573 records, books, papers, and other documents and records
1574 necessary to substantiate compensation. Any documents and
1575 records retained pursuant to this section may be reviewed
Page 63 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1576 subpoenaed for purposes of an audit or examination directed by
1577 the Legislative Auditing Committee pursuant to s. 11.40, and
1578 such subpoena may be enforced in circuit court.
1579 Section 17. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1580 112.324, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1581 112.324 Procedures on complaints of violations and
1582 referrals; public records and meeting exemptions.—
1583 (1) The commission shall investigate an alleged violation
1584 of this part or other alleged breach of the public trust within
1585 the jurisdiction of the commission as provided in s. 8(f), Art.
1586 II of the State Constitution:
1587 (b) Upon receipt of a written referral of a possible
1588 violation of this part or other possible breach of the public
1589 trust from the Governor, the Department of Law Enforcement, a
1590 state attorney, an inspector general, the Florida Accountability
1591 Office, or a United States Attorney.
1592
1593 Within 5 days after receipt of a complaint or referral by the
1594 commission, a copy must be transmitted to the alleged violator.
1595 Section 18. Paragraph (r) of subsection (1) of section
1596 216.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1597 216.011 Definitions.—
1598 (1) For the purpose of fiscal affairs of the state,
1599 appropriations acts, legislative budgets, and approved budgets,
1600 each of the following terms has the meaning indicated:
Page 64 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1601 (r) "Fixed capital outlay" means the appropriation
1602 category used to fund real property (land, buildings, including
1603 appurtenances, fixtures and fixed equipment, structures, etc.),
1604 including additions, replacements, major repairs, and
1605 renovations to real property which materially extend its useful
1606 life or materially improve or change its functional use and may
1607 include including furniture and equipment necessary to furnish
1608 and operate a new or improved facility, and any other purpose
1609 designated as a fixed capital outlay by the Legislature, when
1610 appropriated by the Legislature in the fixed capital outlay
1611 appropriation category. Minor repairs and maintenance which do
1612 not materially extend the useful life or materially improve or
1613 change the functional use of a facility may be appropriated in
1614 an expense, contracted services, or special appropriation
1615 category.
1616 Section 19. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 216.023,
1617 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1618 216.023 Legislative budget requests to be furnished to
1619 Legislature by agencies.—
1620 (1) The head of each state agency, except as provided in
1621 subsection (2), shall submit a final legislative budget request
1622 to the Legislature and to the Governor, as chief budget officer
1623 of the state, in the form and manner prescribed in the budget
1624 instructions and at such time as specified by the Executive
1625 Office of the Governor, based on the agency's independent
Page 65 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1626 judgment of its needs. However, a state agency must may not
1627 submit its complete legislative budget request, including all
1628 supporting forms and schedules required by this chapter, no
1629 later than September 15 of each odd-numbered year and no later
1630 than October 15 of each even-numbered year unless an alternative
1631 date is agreed to be in the best interest of the state by the
1632 Governor and the chairs of the legislative appropriations
1633 committees.
1634 (2) The judicial branch and the Division of Administrative
1635 Hearings shall submit their complete legislative budget requests
1636 directly to the Legislature with a copy to the Governor, as
1637 chief budget officer of the state, in the form and manner as
1638 prescribed in the budget instructions. However, the complete
1639 legislative budget requests, including all supporting forms and
1640 schedules required by this chapter, shall be submitted no later
1641 than September 15 of each odd-numbered year and no later than
1642 October 15 of each even-numbered year unless an alternative date
1643 is agreed to be in the best interest of the state by the
1644 Governor and the chairs of the legislative appropriations
1645 committees.
1646 Section 20. Section 216.052, Florida Statutes, is
1647 repealed.
1648 Section 21. Subsection (3) of section 216.137, Florida
1649 Statutes, is amended to read:
1650 216.137 Sessions of consensus estimating conferences;
Page 66 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1651 workpapers.—
1652 (3) WORKPAPERS.—The Office of Economic and Demographic
1653 Research principal who is responsible for presiding over the
1654 session of a consensus estimating conference, or his or her
1655 designee, is responsible for preparing and distributing the
1656 necessary workpapers before prior to the meetings of the
1657 conference. Unless exempt from s. 119.07(1), such workpapers
1658 must be posted on a publicly available Internet website no later
1659 than 5 p.m. of the 2nd business day, as defined in s. 61.046,
1660 before a scheduled session or meeting of a consensus estimating
1661 conference unless the session is a special impact session of the
1662 conference as provided in paragraph (1)(d), in which they must
1663 be posted no later than one hour before the scheduled impact
1664 session. Any principal may cancel a meeting of the conference if
1665 such workpapers have not been distributed prior to the meeting.
1666 The workpapers shall include comparisons between alternative
1667 information when such comparisons are warranted.
1668 Section 22. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
1669 216.177, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1670 216.177 Appropriations acts, statement of intent,
1671 violation, notice, review and objection procedures.—
1672 (2)
1673 (b) If the chair or the and vice chair of the Legislative
1674 Budget Commission or the President of the Senate or and the
1675 Speaker of the House of Representatives timely advises advise,
Page 67 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1676 in writing, the Executive Office of the Governor or the Chief
1677 Justice of the Supreme Court that an action or a proposed
1678 action, including any expenditure of funds resulting from the
1679 settlement of litigation involving a state agency or officer,
1680 regardless of whether subject to the notice and review
1681 requirements of this chapter or not, exceeds the delegated
1682 authority of the Executive Office of the Governor for the
1683 executive branch or the Chief Justice for the judicial branch,
1684 respectively, or is contrary to legislative policy and intent,
1685 the Governor or the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall
1686 void such action and instruct the affected state agency or
1687 entity of the judicial branch to change immediately its spending
1688 action or spending proposal until the Legislative Budget
1689 Commission or the Legislature addresses the issue. The written
1690 documentation shall indicate the specific reasons that an action
1691 or proposed action exceeds the delegated authority or is
1692 contrary to legislative policy and intent.
1693 Section 23. Subsection (6) of section 216.192, Florida
1694 Statutes, is amended to read:
1695 216.192 Release of appropriations; revision of budgets.—
1696 (6) All budget actions, including the approval of annual
1697 release plans, taken pursuant to the provisions of this section
1698 are subject to the notice and review procedures set forth in s.
1699 216.177.
1700 Section 24. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
Page 68 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1701 216.222, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1702 216.222 Budget Stabilization Fund; criteria for
1703 withdrawing moneys.—
1704 (1) Moneys in the Budget Stabilization Fund may be
1705 transferred to the General Revenue Fund for:
1706 (b) Providing funding for an emergency as defined in s.
1707 252.34. The emergency must have been declared by the Governor
1708 pursuant to s. 252.36 or declared by law. Such a transfer must
1709 be made pursuant to s. 252.37, subject to the conditions in that
1710 section, or pursuant to an appropriation by law.
1711 Section 25. Subsection (4) of section 216.262, Florida
1712 Statutes, is amended to read:
1713 216.262 Authorized positions.—
1714 (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter
1715 relating to increasing the number of authorized positions, and
1716 for the 2025-2026 fiscal year only, if the actual inmate
1717 population of the Department of Corrections in the current
1718 fiscal year exceeds the inmate population projections of the
1719 most recently adopted forecast published by the February 21,
1720 2025, Criminal Justice Estimating Conference for the current
1721 fiscal year by 1 percent for 2 consecutive months or 2 percent
1722 for any month, the Executive Office of the Governor, with the
1723 approval of the Legislative Budget Commission, shall immediately
1724 notify the Criminal Justice Estimating Conference, which shall
1725 convene as soon as possible to revise the estimates. The
Page 69 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1726 Department of Corrections may then submit a budget amendment
1727 requesting the establishment of positions in excess of the
1728 number authorized by the Legislature and additional
1729 appropriations from unallocated general revenue sufficient to
1730 provide for essential staff, fixed capital improvements, and
1731 other resources to provide classification, security, food
1732 services, health services, and other variable expenses within
1733 the institutions to accommodate the estimated increase in the
1734 inmate population. All actions taken pursuant to this subsection
1735 are subject to review and approval by the Legislative Budget
1736 Commission. This subsection expires July 1, 2026.
1737 Section 26. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1738 216.292, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (c),
1739 paragraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraph (a) of subsection
1740 (2), and paragraph (d) of subsection (4) are amended, and a new
1741 paragraph (b) is added to subsection (1) of that section, to
1742 read:
1743 216.292 Appropriations nontransferable; exceptions.—
1744 (1)(a) Funds provided in the General Appropriations Act or
1745 as otherwise expressly provided by law shall be expended only
1746 for the purpose for which appropriated, except that such moneys
1747 may be transferred as provided in this section when it is
1748 determined to be in the best interest of the state.
1749 Appropriations for fixed capital outlay may not be expended for
1750 any other purpose. Appropriations may not be transferred between
Page 70 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1751 state agencies, or between a state agency and the judicial
1752 branch, unless specifically authorized in the General
1753 Appropriations Act or otherwise expressly provided by law.
1754 (b) The Executive Office of the Governor may transfer
1755 funds within and between state agencies for the sole purpose of
1756 implementing statewide distributions for Risk Management
1757 Insurance, Human Resource Services, Department of Administrative
1758 Hearings, and Data Processing Services. Transfers and
1759 adjustments are subject to the notice, review, and objection
1760 procedures of s. 216.177.
1761 (2) The following transfers are authorized to be made by
1762 the head of each department or the Chief Justice of the Supreme
1763 Court whenever it is deemed necessary by reason of changed
1764 conditions:
1765 (a) The transfer of appropriations funded from identical
1766 funding sources, except appropriations for fixed capital outlay,
1767 and the transfer of amounts included within the total original
1768 approved budget and plans of releases of appropriations as
1769 furnished pursuant to ss. 216.181 and 216.192, as follows:
1770 1. Between categories of appropriations within a budget
1771 entity, if no category of appropriation is increased or
1772 decreased by more than 5 percent of the original approved budget
1773 or $250,000, whichever is greater, by all action taken under
1774 this subsection.
1775 2. Between budget entities within identical categories of
Page 71 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1776 appropriations, if no category of appropriation is increased or
1777 decreased by more than 5 percent of the original approved budget
1778 or $250,000, whichever is greater, by all action taken under
1779 this subsection.
1780 3. Any agency exceeding salary rate established pursuant
1781 to s. 216.181(8) on June 30th of any fiscal year shall not be
1782 authorized to make transfers pursuant to subparagraphs 1. and 2.
1783 in the subsequent fiscal year.
1784 4. Notice of proposed transfers under subparagraphs 1. and
1785 2. shall be provided to the Executive Office of the Governor and
1786 the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees at least
1787 3 days before prior to agency implementation in order to provide
1788 an opportunity for review. The review shall be limited to
1789 ensuring that the transfer is in compliance with the
1790 requirements of this paragraph.
1791 5. For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, The review shall ensure
1792 that transfers proposed pursuant to this paragraph comply with
1793 this chapter, maximize the use of available and appropriate
1794 trust funds, and are not contrary to legislative policy and
1795 intent. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2026.
1796 (4) The following transfers are authorized with the
1797 approval of the Legislative Budget Commission. Unless waived by
1798 the chair and vice chair of the commission, notice of such
1799 transfers must be provided 14 days before the commission
1800 meeting:
Page 72 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1801 (d) The transfers necessary to accomplish the purposes of
1802 reorganization within state agencies or the judicial branch
1803 authorized by the Legislature when the necessary adjustments of
1804 appropriations and positions have not been provided in the
1805 General Appropriations Act.
1806 Section 27. Subsection (5) is added to section 409.8134,
1807 Florida Statutes, to read:
1808 409.8134 Program expenditure ceiling; enrollment; budget
1809 amendments.—
1810 (5) Notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, the agency
1811 and the department may each submit a budget amendment, subject
1812 to the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177,
1813 to realign funding within the Florida Kidcare program
1814 appropriation categories, or to increase budget authority in the
1815 Children's Medical Services network category, to address
1816 projected surpluses and deficits within the program or to
1817 maximize the use of state trust funds. A single budget amendment
1818 may be submitted by the agency and the department in the last
1819 quarter of the fiscal year.
1820 Section 28. Subsection (9) is added to section 409.902,
1821 Florida Statutes, to read:
1822 409.902 Designated single state agency; payment
1823 requirements; program title; release of medical records; budget
1824 amendments.—
1825 (9) Notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, the agency
Page 73 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1826 may submit a budget amendment, subject to the notice, review,
1827 and objection procedures of s. 216.177, to realign funding
1828 within the Medicaid program appropriation categories to address
1829 projected surpluses and deficits within the program and to
1830 maximize the use of state trust funds. A single budget amendment
1831 may be submitted by the agency in the last quarter of the fiscal
1832 year.
1833 Section 29. Paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section
1834 20.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1835 20.055 Agency inspectors general.—
1836 (7) In carrying out the investigative duties and
1837 responsibilities specified in this section, each inspector
1838 general shall initiate, conduct, supervise, and coordinate
1839 investigations designed to detect, deter, prevent, and eradicate
1840 fraud, waste, mismanagement, misconduct, and other abuses in
1841 state government. For these purposes, each inspector general
1842 shall:
1843 (a) Receive complaints and coordinate all activities of
1844 the agency as required by the Whistle-blower's Act pursuant to
1845 ss. 112.3187-112.31901 ss. 112.3187-112.31895.
1846 Section 30. Subsection (13) of section 760.06, Florida
1847 Statutes, is amended to read:
1848 760.06 Powers of the commission.—Within the limitations
1849 provided by law, the commission shall have the following powers:
1850 (13) To receive complaints and coordinate all activities
Page 74 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1851 as required by the Whistle-blower's Act pursuant to ss.
1852 112.3187-112.31901 ss. 112.3187-112.31895.
1853 Section 31. (1)(a) Each state agency must review the
1854 agency's rules imposing audit requirements on public or private
1855 entities and, on or before October 1, 2026, report any such rule
1856 that is not specified in statute to the Joint Legislative
1857 Auditing Committee.
1858 (b) The Auditor General, the Joint Legislative Auditing
1859 Committee, and the Office of Program Policy Analysis and
1860 Government Accountability must jointly review all statutory
1861 audit requirements imposed on public or private entities.
1862 (2)(a) By October 1, 2027, the Auditor General, the Joint
1863 Legislative Auditing Committee, and the Office of Program Policy
1864 Analysis and Government Accountability shall deliver a report to
1865 the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
1866 Representatives, and the Chief Inspector General that contains
1867 the following information for each requirement identified in
1868 subsection (1):
1869 1. The citation for the requirement.
1870 2. A recommendation as to the characterization of the
1871 requirement as a financial audit, an operational audit, a
1872 performance audit, or an examination.
1873 3. An estimate of the average annual personnel and
1874 administrative costs of administering or overseeing the
1875 requirement.
Page 75 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5203 2026
1876 4. A recommendation as to which unit of the Florida
1877 Accountability Office should administer the requirement.
1878 5. Suggestions for any necessary revisions to the
1879 requirement, the definitions in s. 11.45, Florida Statutes, and
1880 related statutes to provide clarity and to better conform the
1881 wording of such provisions to the principles and language of the
1882 Government Accountability Office's Government Auditing
1883 Standards, 2024 edition, or any other pertinent auditing or
1884 investigation standards.
1885 (b) The President of the Senate and Speaker of the House
1886 of Representatives may provide additional legislative personnel
1887 and support as necessary to carry out this subsection.
1888 (3) The Administrative Procedures Committee and the
1889 Division of Law Revision shall provide any assistance necessary
1890 to carry out this section.
1891 Section 32. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
1892 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 76 of 76
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5203-00